Utah statutes.
19-6-504.   Assurance of sufficient revenue to pay bonds.
(1)  If a public entity issues bonds to finance a solid waste management
facility and the bonds mature more than ten years after the bonded facility
begins operation, the public entity owning the facility or the public entity
or entities contracting for solid waste management services with the owner of
the facility shall assure that a supply of solid waste will be available to
the facility in quantities sufficient to generate enough income, together with
all other sources of revenue pledged for payment of the bonds, to pay all
principal and interest on the bonds during the term of the bonded
indebtedness.  The assurance may take the form of:
(a)  long-term contracts, at least equal to the period of the bonded
indebtedness, with other public entities or other persons to supply enough
solid waste to the facility to retire the bonded indebtedness of the facility;
or
(b)  ordinances, franchises, or other forms of regulation requiring that
sufficient quantities of solid waste be delivered to the facility for
disposal.
(2)  The department shall make rules for periodic reporting by any public
entity that establishes ordinances, franchises, or other forms of regulation
pursuant to Subsection (1).   The reports shall include information about the
quantities of solid waste being received by the facility and whether the
charges made for processing the solid waste, together with all other sources
of revenue pledged for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds, are
sufficient to meet the debt-service on the bonds.
